Mississippi statutes. Title 81. Banks and Financial Institutions
Subarticle D. Fees.

§ 81-27-3.301.
Fee determination.

The compensation arrangement between a client and any person acting as a trustee or as any other fiduciary pursuant to this chapter shall be at arm’s length and any compensation pursuant to such arrangement shall be a reasonable amount with respect to the services rendered.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-3.302.
Disclosure of potential conflicts of interest.

Any company, proposing to act as a trustee or in any other fiduciary capacity pursuant to a written agreement to be entered into with a prospective client after July 1, 1998, which company has any potential or actual conflict of interest which may reasonably be expected to have an impact on the independence or judgment of such trustee or fiduciary, shall deliver a disclosure statement to the prospective client (i) not less than forty-eight (48) hours prior to entering into any written or oral trust or fiduciary agreement with such client or prospective client, or (ii) at the time of entering into any such agreement if the client has a right to terminate the agreement without penalty within three (3) or more business days after entering into the agreement.

The disclosure statement shall contain appropriate information concerning the actual or potential conflict of interest. If such trustee or other fiduciary proposes to delegate any fiduciary function to an affiliate, the nature of the affiliation and whether the trustee or other fiduciary may directly benefit from the delegation shall be disclosed in the disclosure statement.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.